Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1201
Act, how cited; declaration of policy.

Sections 37-1201 to 37-12,110 shall be known and may be cited as the State Boat Act. It is the policy of this state to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use, operation, and equipment of vessels and to promote uniformity of laws relating thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB49, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 2.